Hawaii statutes.
§446E-5 Prohibited practices. (a) No
unaccredited institution shall indicate or suggest that the State licenses,
approves, or regulates its operations. Acceptance by the director of any
documents from an unaccredited institution shall not be construed as evidence
that the director has determined the adequacy of any filing.

(b) Any institution that is not accredited by
the American Bar Association shall not issue a juris doctor degree (J.D.), a
master of laws degree (LL.M.), or any equivalent or comparable degree.

(c) Any institution that is not accredited by
the Liaison Committee on Medical Education shall not issue a doctor of medicine
degree (M.D.), or any equivalent or comparable degree.

(d) No unaccredited institution shall issue
degrees unless the institution has an office located in Hawaii, at least one
employee who resides in Hawaii, and at least twenty-five enrolled students in
Hawaii, in each academic year of its operation for the purpose of performing
course requirements that are part of the students' educational curriculum.

(e) No unaccredited institution that operates
in or from the State or has a presence in this State shall accept or receive
any tuition payment or other fee from or on behalf of a student unless the
institution complies with all of the requirements of this chapter.

(f) No unaccredited institution shall disclose
in any catalog, promotional material or written contract for instruction that
it has applied for future accreditation. [L 1990, c 226, pt of §1; am L 1999, c
171, §6]

Case Notes

Subsection (f) is not an unconstitutional restriction on free
speech. 486 F. Supp. 2d 1132 (2006).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next